Nevada, session 83, SB429.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB429_R1*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of
$1,600,000 to award scholarships as provided in subsection 3.
2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund to
the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, the sum of $400,000 to award
scholarships as provided in subsection 3.
3. The money appropriated by subsections 1 and 2 must be
used to award scholarships to students who:
(a) Are enrolled in a program to obtain a bachelor’s degree or
master’s degree in social work; and
(b) As part of such a program, are engaging in a field practicum
at a practicum site that is:
(1) A hospital that has been certified as a critical access
hospital by the United States Secretary of Health and Human
Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e);
(2) A rural clinic, as that term is defined in NRS 449.0175;
(3) A rural hospital, as that term is defined in NRS 449.0177;
(4) A rural emergency hospital, as that term is defined in
NRS 449.0178;
(5) In a census tract which, upon commencement of the field
practicum, was designated as a qualified census tract by the United
States Secretary of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to 26
U.S.C. § 42(d)(5)(B)(ii);
(6) In a community in which, according to the decennial
census immediately preceding the commencement of the field
practicum, at least 20 percent of the households were not proficient
in the English language;
(7) On tribal land;
-
*SB429_R1*

– 3 –
(8) A facility of a government agency or health care center
that primarily provides services in a community where tribal
members commonly reside; or
(9) In a county whose population is less than 100,000.
4. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made by
subsections 1 and 2 must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or
any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 18. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB429_R1*